District of Columbia statutes.
31-5608.03

Judicial review.

(a)

If a hearing is conducted under the contested case procedure in accordance with § 2-509, a person suffering a legal wrong, or adversely affected or aggrieved, by an order or decision may appeal to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals in accordance with § 2-510.

(b)

The filing of an appeal under this section shall not stay the application of a rule, regulation, order, or other action of the Commissioner to the appealing party unless the court, after giving the appealing party notice and an opportunity to be heard, determines that failure to grant a stay would be detrimental to the interest of policyholders, shareholders, creditors, or the public.

History

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 803, 47 DCR 7837
June 19, 2001, D.C. Law 13-313, § 22, 48 DCR 1873
June 25, 2002, D.C. Law 14-150, § 2(m), 49 DCR 4238

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-313 rewrote subsec. (a) which had read:
“(a) A person aggrieved by an act, determination, rule, regulation, order, or any other action of the Mayor, may appeal to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals in accordance with § 2-510.”
D.C. Law 14-150 substituted “Commissioner” for “Mayor” throughout the section.